src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k45_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    spónur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: spónur
    spónur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: spón
    spónur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: spóni
    spónur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: spónar
    spónur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: spønir
    spónur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: spønir
    spónur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: [spønum, spónum]
    spónur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: spóna
    spónur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: spónurin
    spónur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: spónin
    spónur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: spóninum
    spónur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: spónarins
    spónur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: spønirnir
    spónur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: spønirnar
    spónur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: [spønunum, spónunum]
    spónur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: spónanna
